Hawaii, session 2025, GM1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the federal funding
freeze imposed by the United States Office of Management and
Budget may have detrimental effects on Hawaii's nonprofit
sector, which provides critical services in health and human
services. Without assistance from the federal government,
Hawaii's federally qualified health centers, and programs that
provide child care, social services, subsidized housing, and
homeless services, will see a significant drop in funding.
The purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys to and
authorize temporary full-time equivalent positions for the
office of community services of the department of labor and
industrial relations to award grants subject to chapter 42F,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, and other qualifications, for fiscal
year 2025-2026, and authorize the office of community services
to contract the services of Aloha United Way, Inc., to assist
with the administration and distribution of grant awards.
SB933 GDI LRB 25-1830.docx
■iiiiimiiiniiiiiiiii

Page 2 S.B. NO.
^2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. The legislature finds and declares that the
grants made pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
under this Act are in the public interest and for the public
health, safety, and general welfare.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000,000 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to
the office of community services of the department of labor and
industrial relations for:
(1) The awarding of grants made pursuant to chapter 42F,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, and the selection process
established pursuant to section 4 of this Act, for the
benefit of nonprofit organizations in the State of
Hawaii; and
(2) The contracting of administrative support services to
evaluate, select, award, distribute moneys to, and
monitor compliance of, grant recipients.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of
community services of the department of labor and industrial
relations for the purpose of this Act.
SB933 CDl LRB 25-1830.docx 2
lIHMMIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIBi

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. (a) Provided that of the general fund
appropriation for the office of community services of the
department of labor and industrial relations (program ID LBR903)
authorized under section 3, the sum of $50,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026, shall be
expended on:
(1) Grants issued in accordance with chapter 42F, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, and subsection (b); and
(2) Any administrative expenses associated with the
selection, award, and administration of the grants.
(b) In selecting recipients and awarding and administering
grants funded by the appropriation contained in section 3 of
this Act, there is established an evaluation and selection
committee to oversee the evaluation and selection of, and
determine grant award amounts to, nonprofit applicants. The
evaluation and selection committee shall be composed of the
following members:
(1) Two senators appointed by the president of the senate;
and
(2) Two representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives.
SB933 GDI LRB 25-1830.docx

S.B. NO. S.3
C.D. 1
The meetings of the evaluation and selection committee shall not
be subject to part I of chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
To be eligible for a grant funded by the appropriation
contained in section 3, applicants shall be recipients or
providers that have sustained a reduction or termination of
their federal funding, or if the applicant is not a direct
federal funding recipient or provider, the applicant shall
primarily serve populations that have been negatively affected
by reductions or terminations of federal funding. Applicants
for a grant under this Act shall provide documentation
evidencing the nature and extent of the federal funding
reduction and its impact on the recipient or provider's
operations, programs, or services, or shall demonstrate the
causal connection between the federal funding change and the
adverse impact on the population served, as well as how the
proposed use of grant funds will mitigate or address that
impact.
In evaluating, selecting, awarding, and administering
grants funded by the appropriation contained in section 3, the
evaluation and selection committee shall apply all qualifying
standards, conditions, and other applicable requirements under
SB933 CDl LRB 25-1830.docx
miiiiioiiBiiiBiiiiiin

Page 5
S.B. NO. S.2
C.D. 1
chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to the grant recipients
and their respective contracts; provided that the grant
application submission deadline contained in section 42F-102,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply to grants applied for
and funded pursuant to this Act.
(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including
chapters 103F and 103D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the office of
community services may contract with Aloha United Way, Inc., to
provide administrative support to the office of community
services to contract and distribute moneys to recipients of
grants awarded pursuant chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
and this Act. Subject to the approval of the evaluation and
selection committee, Aloha United Way, Inc., may charge and
receive an administrative fee of no more than $500,000 to
contract, process, and distribute the award of funds made
available under this Act.
After the settlement of all administrative costs, any
remaining unencumbered and unexpended balance shall be returned
by Aloha United Way, Inc., to the office of community services
for deposit into the State's general fund.
SB933 CDl LRB 25-1830.docx
■iiiiiiiiifliniHiiiiiiiiiiiB

Page 6 S.B. NO.
3^2
CD. 1
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $140,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the
office of community services to carry out its responsibilities
under this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended as
follows:
(1) $130,000 for the establishment of two temporary
full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) positions; and
(2) $10,000 for the purchase of office equipment and
furniture.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of
community services of the department of labor and industrial
relations.
SECTION 6. If any portion of this Act or its application
to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for
any reason, the legislature declares that the remainder of the
Act and any other provision thereof shall not be affected
thereby. If any portion of a specific appropriation is held to
be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall be
expended to fulfill the objective of that appropriation to the
extent possible.
SB933 CDl LRB 25-1830.docx
■lllllllllllllllllllllilll

Page 7 933
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 7. If manifest clerical, typographical, or other
mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor may
correct the errors.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
SB933 CDl LRB 25-1830.docx
■niiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiM

933
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 9th day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 933, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
127

SB No. 933, SD 2, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives